Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-734
Mortgage loan originator license; inactive status; duration; renewal; reactivation.

(1) A mortgage loan originator whose license is placed on inactive status under this section shall not act as a mortgage loan originator in this state until such time as the license is reactivated.

(2) The department shall place a mortgage loan originator license on inactive status upon the occurrence of one of the following:

(a) Upon receipt of a notice from either the licensed mortgage banker, registrant, installment loan company, or mortgage loan originator that the mortgage loan originator's relationship as an employee or independent agent of a licensed mortgage banker or installment loan company has been terminated;

(b) Upon the cancellation of the employing licensed mortgage banker's license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the cancellation of the employing installment loan company's license pursuant to subsection (5) of section 45-338 for failure to maintain the required surety bond;

(c) Upon the voluntary surrender of the employing licensed mortgage banker's license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the voluntary surrender of the employing installment loan company's license pursuant to section 45-341;

(d) Upon the expiration of the employing licensed mortgage banker's license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the expiration of the employing installment loan company's license pursuant to subsection (3) of section 45-340 if such mortgage loan originator has renewed his or her license pursuant to section 45-732;

(e) Upon the revocation or suspension of the employing licensed mortgage banker's license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the revocation or suspension of the employing installment loan company's license pursuant to subsection (2) of section 45-341; or

(f) Upon the cancellation, surrender, or expiration of the employing registrant's registration with the department.

(3) If a mortgage loan originator license becomes inactive under this section, the license shall remain inactive until the license expires, the licenseholder surrenders the license, the license is revoked or suspended pursuant to section 45-742, or the license is reactivated.

(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a mortgage loan originator who holds an inactive mortgage loan originator license may renew such inactive license if he or she remains otherwise eligible for renewal pursuant to section 45-732 except for being covered by a surety bond pursuant to subdivision (1)(f) of section 45-729. Such renewal shall not reactivate the license.

(5) A mortgage loan originator who holds an inactive mortgage loan originator license that has been renewed one time may not renew such inactive license for a second annual licensing period unless (a) the inactive license was reactivated after such inactive license was renewed or (b) the mortgage loan originator demonstrates good cause to the director to allow renewal of the inactive license for an additional annual licensing period.

(6) The department has the authority to reactivate a mortgage loan originator license upon receipt of a notice pursuant to section 45-735 that the mortgage loan originator licensee has been hired as a mortgage loan originator by a licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company and if such mortgage loan originator meets the conditions for licensing at the time the reactivation notice is received, including, but not limited to, coverage by a surety bond pursuant to subdivision (1)(f) of section 45-729.

Laws 2009, LB328, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB355, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 106.